New Jersey, session 222, A4501.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  As used in this section: Board means the Board of Public Utilities or any successor agency. Public utility has the same meaning as defined in R.S.48:2-13. b.    A public utility that has filed a petition with the board to increase an individual rate, joint rate, toll, charge, or schedule thereof shall notify its affected customers of the filing.  The notice shall be included with each customers first utility bill following the date of the filing and shall include, but not be limited to: (1)   a summary of the contents of the filing; (2)   the reasoning for the filing; (3)   a statement of the filings impact on affected customers; (4)   information about any public hearings concerning the filing; and (5)   how affected customers can testify in support of or in opposition to the filing. c.     A public utility shall allow customers to opt in to receive email notifications containing information about hearings related to petitions filed by the public utility with the board to increase an individual rate, joint rate, toll, charge, or schedule thereof. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.